California statutes. Civil Code
An association has standing to institute, defend, settle, or intervene in litigation, arbitration, mediation, or administrative proceedings in its own name as the real party in interest and without joining with it the members, in matters pertaining to the following:

(a) Enforcement of the governing documents.

(b) Damage to the common area.

(c) Damage to a separate interest that the association is obligated to maintain or repair.

(d) Damage to a separate interest that arises out of, or is integrally related to, damage to the common area or a separate interest that the association is obligated to maintain or repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5985.

(a) In an action maintained by an association pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 5980, the amount of damages recovered by the association shall be reduced by the amount of damages allocated to the association or its managing agents in direct proportion to their percentage of fault based upon principles of comparative fault. The comparative fault of the association or its managing agents may be raised by way of defense, but shall not be the basis
for a cross-action or separate action against the association or its managing agents for contribution or implied indemnity, where the only damage was sustained by the association or its members. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to require that comparative fault be pleaded as an affirmative defense, rather than a separate cause of action, where the only damage was sustained by the association or its members.

(b) In an action involving damages described in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 5980, the defendant or cross-defendant may allege and prove the comparative fault of the association or its managing agents as a setoff to the liability of the defendant or cross-defendant even if the association is not a party to the litigation or is no longer a party whether by reason of settlement, dismissal, or otherwise.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply
to actions commenced on or after January 1, 1993.

(d) Nothing in this section affects a person’s liability under Section 1431, or the liability of the association or its managing agent for an act or omission that causes damages to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5986.

(a) Subject to compliance with Section 6150, which requires the board to provide notice of a meeting with the members to discuss, among other things, problems that may lead to the filing of a civil action, before the board files a civil action against a declarant or other developer, or within 30 days after it files the action, if the association has reason to believe that the applicable statute of limitations will expire, and notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the governing documents, the board shall have the authority to commence and pursue a claim, civil action, arbitration, prelitigation process pursuant to Section 6000 or Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2, or other legal proceeding
 against a declarant, developer, or builder of a common interest development. If the board includes members appointed by, or affiliated with, the declarant, developer, or builder, the decision and authority to commence and pursue legal proceedings shall be vested solely in the nonaffiliated board members.

(b) The governing documents shall not impose any preconditions or limitations on the board’s authority to commence and pursue any claim, civil action, arbitration, prelitigation process pursuant to Section 6000 or Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2, or other legal proceeding against a declarant, developer, or builder of a common interest development. Any limitation or precondition, including, but not limited to, requiring a membership vote as a prerequisite to, or otherwise providing the declarant, developer,
 or builder with veto authority over, the board’s commencement and pursuit of a claim, civil action, arbitration, prelitigation process, or legal proceeding against the declarant, developer, or builder, or any incidental decision of the board, including, but not limited to, retaining legal counsel or incurring costs or expenses, is unenforceable, null, and void. The failure to comply with those limitations or preconditions, if only, shall not be asserted as a defense to any claim or action described in this section.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), any provision in the governing documents imposing limitations or preconditions on the board’s authority to commence and pursue claims shall be valid and enforceable if the provision is adopted solely by the nondeclarant affiliated members of the association and the provision is
 adopted in accordance with the requirements necessary to amend the governing documents of the association.

(d) This section applies to all governing documents, whether recorded before or after the effective date of this section, and applies retroactively to claims initiated before the effective date of this section, except if those claims have been resolved through an executed settlement, a final arbitration decision, or a final judicial decision on the merits.

(e) Nothing in this section extends any applicable statute of limitation or repose to file or initiate any claim, civil action, arbitration, prelitigation process, or other legal proceeding. Nothing in this section shall affect any other obligations of an association contained in Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of
 Part 2 of Division 2, or any other provision in the covenants, conditions, and restrictions of the association related to arbitration or other alternative dispute resolution procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.   (SB 326)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Construction Defect Litigation [6100. - 6150.]

6100.

(a) As soon as is reasonably practicable after the association and the builder have entered into a settlement agreement or the matter has otherwise been resolved regarding alleged defects in the common areas, alleged defects in the separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, or alleged defects in the separate interests that arise out of, or are integrally related to, defects in the common areas or separate interests that the
 association is obligated to maintain or repair, where the defects giving rise to the dispute have not been corrected, the association shall, in writing, inform only the members of the association whose names appear on the records of the association that the matter has been resolved, by settlement agreement or other means, and disclose all of the following:

(1) A general description of the defects that the association reasonably believes, as of the date of the disclosure, will be corrected or replaced.

(2) A good faith estimate, as of the date of the disclosure, of when the association believes that the defects identified in paragraph (1) will be corrected or replaced. The association may state that the estimate may be modified.

(3) The status of the claims for defects in the design or construction of the common
 interest development that were not identified in paragraph (1) whether expressed in a preliminary list of defects sent to each member of the association or otherwise claimed and disclosed to the members of the association.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude an association from amending the disclosures required pursuant to subdivision (a), and any amendments shall supersede any prior conflicting information disclosed to the members of the association and shall retain any privilege attached to the original disclosures.

(c) Disclosure of the information required pursuant to subdivision (a) or authorized by subdivision (b) shall not waive any privilege attached to the information.

(d) For the purposes of the disclosures required pursuant to this section, the term “defects” shall be defined to include any damage
 resulting from defects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

6150.

(a) Not later than 30 days before filing of any civil action by the association against the declarant or other developer of a common interest development for alleged damage to the common areas, alleged damage to the separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, or alleged damage to the separate interests that arises out of, or is integrally related to, damage to the common areas or separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, the board shall provide a written notice to each member of the association who appears on the records of the association when the notice is provided. This notice shall specify all of the following:

(1) That a meeting will take place to discuss problems that may lead to the filing of a civil action, in addition to the potential impacts thereof to the association and its members, including any financial impacts.

(2) The options, including civil actions, that are available to address the problems.

(3) The time and place of the meeting.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the association has reason to believe that the applicable statute of limitations will expire before the association files the civil action, the association may give the notice, as described above, within 30 days after the filing of the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 207, Sec. 3.   (SB 326)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.3. Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Developments [6500. - 6876.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [6500. - 6566.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Provisions [6500. - 6524.]

6500.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Development Act. In a provision of this part, the part may be referred to as the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

Division, part, title, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.

Nothing in the act that added this part shall be construed to invalidate a document prepared or action taken before January 1, 2014, if the document or action was proper under the law governing common interest developments at the time that the document was prepared or the action was taken. For the purposes of this section, “document” does not include a governing document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6510.

Unless a contrary intent is clearly expressed, a local zoning ordinance is construed to treat like structures, lots, parcels, areas, or spaces in like manner regardless of the form of the common interest development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6512.

(a) If a provision of this act requires that a document be delivered to an association, the document shall be delivered to the person designated to receive documents on behalf of the association, in a written notice delivered by the association to members by individual delivery. If notice of this designation has not been given, the document shall be delivered to the president or secretary of the association.

(b) A document delivered pursuant to this section may be delivered by any of the following methods:

(1) First-class mail, postage prepaid, registered or certified mail, express mail, or overnight delivery by an express service carrier.

(2) By email, facsimile, or other electronic means, if the association has assented to that method of delivery.

(3) By personal delivery, if the association has assented to that method of delivery. If the association accepts a document by personal delivery it shall provide a written receipt acknowledging delivery of the document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6514.

(a) If a provision of this act requires that an association deliver a document by “individual delivery” or “individual notice,” the document shall be delivered by one of the following methods:

(1) First-class mail, postage prepaid, registered or certified mail, express mail, or overnight delivery by an express service carrier. The document shall be addressed to the recipient at the address last
shown on the books of the association.

(2) Email, facsimile, or other electronic means, if the recipient has consented, in writing, to that method of delivery. The consent may be revoked, in writing, by the recipient.

(b) For the purposes of this section, an unrecorded provision of the governing documents providing for a particular method of delivery does not constitute agreement by a member to that method of delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6518.

(a) This section governs the delivery of a document pursuant to this act.

(b) If a document is delivered by mail, delivery is deemed to be complete on deposit into the United States mail.

(c) If a document is delivered by electronic means, delivery is complete at the time of transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6520.

If the association or a member has consented to receive information by electronic delivery, and a provision of this act requires that the information be in writing, that requirement is satisfied if the information is provided in an electronic record capable of retention by the recipient at the time of receipt. An electronic record is not capable of retention by the recipient if the sender or its information processing system inhibits the ability of the recipient to print or store the
electronic record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6522.

If a provision of this act requires that an action be approved by a majority of all members, the action shall be approved or ratified by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6524.

If a provision of this act requires that an action be approved by a majority of a quorum of the members, the action shall be approved or ratified by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting in a duly held election in which a quorum is represented, which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [6526. - 6566.]

6526.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6528.

“Association” means a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association created for the purpose of managing a common interest development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6530.

“Board” means the board of directors of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6531.

A “commercial or industrial common interest development” means a common interest development that is limited to industrial or commercial uses by law or by a declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions that has been recorded in the official records of each county in which the common interest development is located. For the purposes of this section, “commercial use” includes, but is not limited to, the operation of a business that provides facilities for the overnight stay of
its customers, employees, or agents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6532.

(a) “Common area” means the entire common interest development except the separate interests therein. The estate in the common area may be a fee, a life estate, an estate for years, or any combination of the foregoing.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in a planned development described in subdivision (b) of Section 6562, the common area may consist of mutual or reciprocal easement rights
appurtenant to the separate interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6534.

“Common interest development” means any of the following:

(a) A condominium project.

(b) A planned development.

(c) A stock cooperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6540.

“Condominium plan” means a plan described in Section 6624.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6542.

(a) A “condominium project” means a real property development consisting of condominiums.

(b) A condominium consists of an undivided interest in common in a portion of real property coupled with a separate interest in space called a unit, the boundaries of which are described on a recorded final map, parcel map, or condominium plan in sufficient detail to locate all boundaries thereof. The area
within these boundaries may be filled with air, earth, water, or fixtures, or any combination thereof, and need not be physically attached to land except by easements for access and, if necessary, support. The description of the unit may refer to (1) boundaries described in the recorded final map, parcel map, or condominium plan, (2) physical boundaries, either in existence, or to be constructed, such as walls, floors, and ceilings of a structure or any portion thereof, (3) an entire structure containing one or more units, or (4) any combination thereof.

(c) The portion or portions of the real property held in undivided interest may be all of the real property, except for the separate interests, or may include a particular three-dimensional portion thereof, the boundaries of which are described on a recorded final map, parcel map, or condominium plan. The area within these boundaries may be filled with air, earth, water, or fixtures, or any
combination thereof, and need not be physically attached to land except by easements for access and, if necessary, support.

(d) An individual condominium within a condominium project may include, in addition, a separate interest in other portions of the real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6544.

“Declarant” means the person or group of persons designated in the declaration as declarant, or if no declarant is designated, the person or group of persons who sign the original declaration or who succeed to special rights, preferences, or privileges designated in the declaration as belonging to the signator of the original declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6546.

“Declaration” means the document, however denominated, that contains the information required by Section 6614.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6548.

“Director” means a natural person who serves on the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6550.

(a) “Exclusive use common area” means a portion of the common area designated by the declaration for the exclusive use of one or more, but fewer than all, of the owners of the separate interests and which is or will be appurtenant to the separate interest or interests.

(b) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, patios,
exterior doors, doorframes, and hardware incident thereto, screens and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single separate interest, but located outside the boundaries of the separate interest, are exclusive use common area allocated exclusively to that separate interest.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of the declaration, internal and external telephone wiring designed to serve a single separate interest, but located outside the boundaries of the separate interest, is exclusive use common area allocated exclusively to that separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6552.

“Governing documents” means the declaration and any other documents, such as bylaws, operating rules, articles of incorporation, or articles of association, which govern the operation of the common interest development or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6553.

“Individual notice” means the delivery of a document pursuant to Section 6514.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6554.

“Member” means an owner of a separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6560.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6562.

“Planned development” means a real property development other than a condominium project, or a stock cooperative, having either or both of the following features:

(a) Common area that is owned either by an association or in common by the owners of the separate interests who possess appurtenant rights to the beneficial use and enjoyment of the common area.

(b) Common area and an association that maintains the common area with the power to levy assessments that may become a lien upon the separate interests in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 6808) of Chapter 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6564.

(a) “Separate interest” has the following meanings:

(1) In a condominium project, “separate interest” means a separately owned unit, as specified in Section 6542.

(2) In a planned development, “separate interest” means a separately owned lot, parcel, area, or space.

(3) In a stock cooperative, “separate interest” means the exclusive right to occupy a portion of the real property, as specified in Section 6566.

(b) Unless the declaration or condominium plan, if any exists, otherwise provides, if walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a separate interest, the interior surfaces of the perimeter walls, floors, ceilings, windows, doors, and outlets located within the separate interest are part of the separate interest and any other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are part of the common area.

(c) The estate in a separate interest may be a fee, a life estate, an estate for years, or any combination of the foregoing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6566.

“Stock cooperative” means a development in which a corporation is formed or availed of, primarily for the purpose of holding title to, either in fee simple or for a term of years, improved real property, and all or substantially all of the shareholders of the corporation receive a right of exclusive occupancy in a portion of the real property, title to which is held by the corporation. The owners’ interest in the corporation, whether evidenced by a share of stock, a certificate of
membership, or otherwise, shall be deemed to be an interest in a common interest development and a real estate development for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section 25100 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Application of Act [6580. - 6582.]

6580.

Subject to Section 6582, this act applies and a common interest development is created whenever a separate interest coupled with an interest in the common area or membership in the association is, or has been, conveyed, provided all of the following are recorded:

(a) A declaration.

(b) A condominium plan, if any exists.

(c) A final map or parcel map, if Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code requires the recording of either a final map or parcel map for the common interest development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6582.

(a) This act applies only to a commercial or industrial common interest development.

(b) Nothing in this act may be construed to apply to a real property development that does not contain common area. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Governing Documents [6600. - 6632.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6600. - 6610.]

6600.

(a) To the extent of any conflict between the governing documents and the law, the law shall prevail.

(b) To the extent of any conflict between the articles of incorporation and the declaration, the declaration shall prevail.

(c) To the extent of any conflict between the bylaws and the articles of incorporation or declaration, the
articles of incorporation or declaration shall prevail.

(d) To the extent of any conflict between the operating rules and the bylaws, articles of incorporation, or declaration, the bylaws, articles of incorporation, or declaration shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6602.

Any deed, declaration, or condominium plan for a common interest development shall be liberally construed to facilitate the operation of the common interest development, and its provisions shall be presumed to be independent and severable. Nothing in Article 3 (commencing with Section 715) of Chapter 2 of Title 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 shall operate to invalidate any provisions of the governing documents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6604.

In interpreting deeds and condominium plans, the existing physical boundaries of a unit in a condominium project, when the boundaries of the unit are contained within a building, or of a unit reconstructed in substantial accordance with the original plans thereof, shall be conclusively presumed to be its boundaries rather than the metes and bounds expressed in the deed or condominium plan, if any exists, regardless of settling or lateral movement of the building and regardless of
minor variance between boundaries shown on the plan or in the deed and those of the building.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6606.

(a) No declaration or other governing document shall include a restrictive covenant in violation of Section 12955 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or provision of the governing documents, the board, without approval of the members, shall amend any declaration or other governing document that includes a restrictive covenant prohibited by this section to delete the restrictive covenant, and shall restate the declaration or other governing document without the restrictive covenant but with no other change to the declaration or governing document.

(c) If the declaration is amended under this section, the board shall record the restated declaration in each county in
 which the common interest development is located. If the articles of incorporation are amended under this section, the board shall file a certificate of amendment with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 7814 of the Corporations Code.

(d) If after providing written notice to an association, pursuant to Section 6512, requesting that the association delete a restrictive covenant that violates subdivision (a), and the association fails to delete the restrictive covenant within 30 days of receiving the notice, Civil Rights Department, a city or county in which a common interest development is located, or any person may bring an action against the association for injunctive relief to enforce subdivision (a).
 The court may award attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 8.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the governing documents to the contrary, the board may, after the developer has completed construction of the development, has terminated construction activities, and has terminated marketing activities for the sale, lease, or other disposition of separate interests within the development, adopt an amendment deleting from any of the governing documents any provision which is unequivocally designed and intended, or which by its
nature can only have been designed or intended, to facilitate the developer in completing the construction or marketing of the development. However, provisions of the governing documents relative to a particular construction or marketing phase of the development may not be deleted under the authorization of this subdivision until that construction or marketing phase has been completed.

(b) The provisions which may be deleted by action of the board shall be limited to those which provide for access by the developer over or across the common area for the purposes of (1) completion of construction of the development, and (2) the erection, construction, or maintenance of structures or other facilities designed to facilitate the completion of construction or marketing of separate interests.

(c) At least 30 days prior to taking action pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall deliver
to all members, by individual delivery pursuant to Section 6514, (1) a copy of all amendments to the governing documents proposed to be adopted under subdivision (a), and (2) a notice of the time, date, and place the board will consider adoption of the amendments.

 The board may consider adoption of amendments to the governing documents pursuant to subdivision (a) only at a meeting that is open to all members, who shall be given opportunity to make comments thereon. All deliberations of the board on any action proposed under subdivision (a) shall only be conducted in an open meeting.

(d) The board may not amend the governing documents pursuant to this section without the approval of a majority of a quorum of the members, pursuant to Section 6524. For the purposes of this section, “quorum” means more than 50 percent of the members who own no more than two separate interests in the
development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6610.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or provision of the governing documents, if the governing documents include a reference to a provision of the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act that was continued in a new provision by the act that added this section, the board may amend the governing documents, solely to correct the cross-reference, by adopting a board resolution that shows the correction. Member approval is not required in order to adopt a
resolution pursuant to this section.

(b) A declaration that is corrected under this section may be restated in corrected form and recorded, provided that a copy of the board resolution authorizing the corrections is recorded along with the restated declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Declaration [6614. - 6620.]

6614.

(a) A declaration, recorded on or after January 1, 1986, shall contain a legal description of the common interest development, and a statement that the common interest development is a condominium project, planned development, stock cooperative, or combination thereof. The declaration shall additionally set forth the name of the association and the restrictions on the use or enjoyment of any portion of the common interest development that are intended to be
enforceable equitable servitudes.

(b) The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant or the members consider appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6616.

Except to the extent that a declaration provides by its express terms that it is not amendable, in whole or in part, a declaration that fails to include provisions permitting its amendment at all times during its existence may be amended at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6618.

(a) The Legislature finds that there are common interest developments that have been created with deed restrictions that do not provide a means for the members to extend the term of the declaration. The Legislature further finds that covenants and restrictions, contained in the declaration, are an appropriate method for protecting the common plan of developments and to provide for a mechanism for financial support for the upkeep of common area including, but not
limited to, roofs, roads, heating systems, and recreational facilities. If declarations terminate prematurely, common interest developments may deteriorate and the supply of affordable units could be impacted adversely. The Legislature further finds and declares that it is in the public interest to provide a vehicle for extending the term of the declaration if the extension is approved by a majority of all members, pursuant to Section 6522.

(b) A declaration that specifies a termination date, but that contains no provision for extension of the termination date, may be extended, before its termination date, by the approval of members pursuant to Section 6620.

(c) No single extension of the terms of the declaration made pursuant to this section shall exceed the initial term of the declaration or 20 years, whichever is less. However, more than one extension may occur pursuant to this
section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6620.

(a) A declaration may be amended pursuant to the declaration or this act. An amendment is effective after all of the following requirements have been met:

(1) The proposed amendment has been delivered by individual notice to all members not less than 15 days and not more than 60 days prior to any approval being solicited.

(2) The
amendment has been approved by the percentage of members required by the declaration and any other person whose approval is required by the declaration.

(3) That fact has been certified in a writing executed and acknowledged by the officer designated in the declaration or by the association for that purpose, or if no one is designated, by the president of the association.

(4) The amendment has been recorded in each county in which a portion of the common interest development is located.

(b) If the declaration does not specify the percentage of members who must approve an amendment of the declaration, an amendment may be approved by a majority of all members, pursuant to Section 6522.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Articles of Incorporation [6622. - 6622.]

6622.

(a) The articles of incorporation of an association filed with the Secretary of State shall include a statement, which shall be in addition to the statement of purposes of the corporation, that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies the corporation as an association formed to manage a common interest development under the Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Development Act.

(2) States the business or corporate office of the association, if any, and, if the office is not on the site of the common interest development, states the front street and nearest cross street for the physical location of the common interest development.

(3) States the name and address of the association’s managing agent, if any.

(b) The statement filed by an incorporated association with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 8210 of the Corporations Code shall also contain a statement identifying the corporation as an association formed to manage a common interest development under the Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Development Act.

(c) Documents filed prior to January 1, 2014, in compliance with former Section 1363.5, as it read on
January 1, 2013, are deemed to be in compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Condominium Plan [6624. - 6628.]

6624.

A condominium plan shall contain all of the following:

(a) A description or survey map of a condominium project, which shall refer to or show monumentation on the ground.

(b) A three-dimensional description of a condominium project, one or more dimensions of which may extend for an indefinite distance upwards or downwards, in sufficient detail to identify
the common area and each separate interest.

(c) A certificate consenting to the recordation of the condominium plan pursuant to this act that is signed and acknowledged as provided in Section 6626.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)